test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-nensg_ade_gt-norm.yaml
    venäläinen+N+Sg+Ade: venäläiselä
    vihavenäläinen+N+Sg+Ade: vihavenäläiselä
    hörhöläinen+N+Sg+Ade: hörhöläiselä
    lähimäinen+N+Sg+Ade: lähimäiselä
    jyrkymäinen+N+Sg+Ade: jyrkymäiselä
    väkinäinen+N+Sg+Ade: väkinäiselä
    ykspäinen+N+Sg+Ade: ykspäiselä
    määkyväinen+N+Sg+Ade: määkyväiselä
    ystäväinen+N+Sg+Ade: ystäväiselä
    äytyäinen+N+Sg+Ade: äytyäiselä
    isotyöinen+N+Sg+Ade: isotyöiselä
    leivononen+N+Sg+Ade: leivonosela
    vihaluontonen+N+Sg+Ade: vihaluontosela
    kivaluontonen+N+Sg+Ade: kivaluontosela
